apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="c/òghere__vblex" c="p.45">
      <e>       <p><l>òghere</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>òghere</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oghendi</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oghendi</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>oghende</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghende</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ogo</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghes</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghet</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghimus</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghides</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghent</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>oghia</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghias</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghiat</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghiamus</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghiais</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghiant</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>oga</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogas</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogat</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogamus</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogais</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogant</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>oghere</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogheres</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogheret</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogheremus</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghereis</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogherent</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>oge</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oge</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogat</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogamus</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oghide</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ogant</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>atu</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ata</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atos</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atas</l><r>òghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="còghere"><i>c</i><par n="c/òghere__vblex"/></e>
